Utah statutes.
57-8a-221.   Reincorporation of terminated or dissolved association.

(1)  An association that is terminated or dissolved without possibility of reinstatement under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, may be reincorporated by the acting directors of the association refiling articles of incorporation that are substantially similar to the articles of incorporation, as amended, in existence at the time of termination or dissolution.

(2)  Upon the association's reincorporation under Subsection (1):

(a)  the board of directors shall readopt bylaws for the association that are the same as the bylaws that were in existence at the time of termination or dissolution; and

(b)  all lot owners within the project are members of the reincorporated association.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

